Missouri, session 2026, HB2926.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Section 537.600, RSMo, is repealed and one new section enacted in lieu
thereof, to be known as section 537.600, to read as follows:
537.600. 1. Such sovereign or governmental tort immunity as existed at common law
in this state prior to September 12, 1977, except to the extent waived, abrogated or modified
by statutes in effect prior to that date, shall remain in full force and effect; except that, the
immunity of the public entity from liability and suit for compensatory damages for negligent
acts or omissions is hereby expressly waived in the following instances:
(1) Injuries directly resulting from the negligent acts or omissions by public
employees arising out of the operation of motor vehicles or motorized vehicles within the
course of their employment;
(2) Injuries caused by the condition of a public entity's property if the plaintiff
establishes that the property was in dangerous condition at the time of the injury, that the
injury directly resulted from the dangerous condition, that the dangerous condition created a
reasonably foreseeable risk of harm of the kind of injury which was incurred, and that either a
negligent or wrongful act or omission of an employee of the public entity within the course of
his employment created the dangerous condition or a public entity had actual or constructive
notice of the dangerous condition in sufficient time prior to the injury to have taken measures
to protect against the dangerous condition. In any action under this subdivision wherein a
plaintiff alleges that he was damaged by the negligent, defective or dangerous design of a
highway or road, which was designed and constructed prior to September 12, 1977, the public
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HCS HB 2926 2
entity shall be entitled to a defense which shall be a complete bar to recovery whenever the
public entity can prove by a preponderance of the evidence that the alleged negligent,
defective, or dangerous design reasonably complied with highway and road design standards
generally accepted at the time the road or highway was designed and constructed.
2. The express waiver of sovereign immunity in the instances specified in
subdivisions (1) and (2) of subsection 1 of this section are absolute waivers of sovereign
immunity in all cases within such situations whether or not the public entity was functioning
in a governmental or proprietary capacity and whether or not the public entity is covered by a
liability insurance for tort.
3. The term "public entity" as used in this section shall include any multistate
compact agency created by a compact formed between this state and any other state which has
been approved by the Congress of the United States.
4. When acting within the scope of a government contract awarded by the
Missouri department of transportation, private contractors, subcontractors, engineers,
or the employees thereof performing work in accordance with the plans and
specifications approved by such department shall have sovereign or governmental
tort immunity to the same extent as the Missouri department of transportation,
including any limitation on awards for liability provided under section 537.610.
5. A contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for claims arising from the
design, condition, or maintenance of a transportation project occurring after execution
of the contract and prior to the commencement of physical construction activities on the
project site.
6. During performance of physical construction activities, a contractor,
subcontractor, or employee thereof shall be deemed an agent of the state for purposes
of sovereign or governmental tort immunity when performing work within the scope of
the contract and in material compliance with plans, specifications, or directives
approved by the Missouri department of transportation, applicable to the condition
alleged to have caused injury, and without authority to materially deviate from such
plans or directives.
7. Upon acceptance of the project, including partial acceptance, substantial
completion, or final acceptance by the Missouri department of transportation, liability
for the design, condition, maintenance, and performance of the completed project shall
rest with the public entity, and the contractor or subcontractor shall not be liable for
claims arising thereafter.
8. The immunity provided under this subsection shall not apply to negligent or
reckless acts, failure to materially comply with approved plans and specifications, or
acts or omissions outside the scope of the contract.

HCS HB 2926 3
9. Such immunity shall be subject to the exceptions otherwise set forth in this
section.
✔